Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3242.2, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 3242.2. A. Except as otherwise provided in Section

3242 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, an An individual who is

not lawfully present in the United States shall not be eligible on

the basis of residence within the this state for:

1. Any postsecondary education benefit, including, but not

limited to, scholarships or financial aid; or

2. Resident tuition.



Req. No. 2211 Page 1

B. The provisions of subsection A of this section shall not

apply to a student enrolled in a degree program at a postsecondary

educational institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher

Education during the 2006-2007 school year or any prior year who

received a resident tuition benefit pursuant to Section 3242 of

Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes at that institution The Oklahoma

State Regents for Higher Education may promulgate rules to implement

the provisions of this section.

SECTION 2. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 3242, is

hereby repealed.

SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation

of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby

declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and

be in full force from and after its passage and approval.



60-2-2211 EB 12/15/2025 3:44:14 PM















Req. No. 2211 Page 2